test/src/morphology/N-nado_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - nado: # Noun 'sister-in-law'
     nado+N+Sg+Nom: nado
     nado+N+Sg+Gen: nadon
     nado+N+Sg+Acc: [nado, nadon]
     nado+N+Sg+Par: nadod
     nado+N+Sg+Tra: nadoks
     nado+N+Sg+Abe: nadota
     nado+N+Sg+Com: nadonke
     nado+N+Sg+Ine: nados
     nado+N+Sg+Ela: nadospäi
     nado+N+Sg+Ill: nadoho
     nado+N+Sg+Ade: nadol
     nado+N+Sg+Abl: nadolpäi
     nado+N+Sg+All: nadole
     nado+N+Sg+EssInst: nadon
     nado+N+Sg+Prl: nadodme
     nado+N+Sg+Apr1: nadonno
     nado+N+Sg+Apr2: nadonnoks
     nado+N+Sg+Egr: nadonnopäi
     nado+N+Sg+Ter1: nadohosai
     nado+N+Sg+Ter2: nadolesai
     nado+N+Sg+Ter3: nadossai
     nado+N+Sg+Add1: nadohopäi
     nado+N+Sg+Add2: nadolepäi

     nado+N+Pl+Nom: nadod
     nado+N+Pl+Gen: [nadoiden, nadoidʼen]
     nado+N+Pl+Acc: nadod 
     nado+N+Pl+Par: nadoid
     nado+N+Pl+Tra: nadoikš
     nado+N+Pl+Abe: nadoita
     nado+N+Pl+Com: nadoidenke
     nado+N+Pl+Ine: nadoiš
     nado+N+Pl+Ela: nadoišpäi
     nado+N+Pl+Ill: nadoihe
     nado+N+Pl+Ade: nadoil
     nado+N+Pl+Abl: nadoilpäi
     nado+N+Pl+All: nadoile
     nado+N+Pl+EssInst: nadoin
     nado+N+Pl+Prl: nadoidme
     nado+N+Pl+Apr1: nadoidenno
     nado+N+Pl+Apr2: nadoidennoks
     nado+N+Pl+Egr: nadoidennopäi
     nado+N+Pl+Ter1: nadoihesai
     nado+N+Pl+Ter2: nadoilesai
#     nado+N+Pl+Ter3: nadossai
     nado+N+Pl+Add1: nadoihepäi
     nado+N+Pl+Add2: nadoilepäi
